Hawaii statutes.
§431K-7.5 Purchasing group taxation.
Premium taxes and taxes on premiums paid for coverage of risks resident or
located in this State by a purchasing group or any members of the
purchasing group shall be:

(1) Imposed at the same rate and subject to the same
interest, fines, and penalties as that applicable to premium taxes and taxes on
premiums paid for similar coverage from a similar insurance source by other
insurers; and

(2) Paid first by that insurance source, and if not
by that source, then by the producer for the purchasing group, and if not by
that producer, then by the purchasing group, and if not by that purchasing
group, then by each of its members. [L 1993, c 321, §4; am L 2002, c 155, §99]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next